Delaware, session 153, HB413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4356A, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4356A. Use of revolving or flashing green light. (a) A motor vehicle vehicle, truck tractor, OHV, farm tractor, or specialized construction equipment may be equipped with a green revolving or flashing light if the motor vehicle vehicle, truck tractor, OHV, farm tractor, or specialized construction equipment meets any of the following requirements: (1) Is used by a fire department or police department. (2) Is designated or authorized as an emergency vehicle by the Secretary of the Department of Safety and Homeland Security and used by a federal, state, county, or municipal agency or public service corporation. (3) Is snow removal equipment that is owned and operated by the State or a municipality. used for road or bridge construction, maintenance or repairs, as well as traffic control, emergency operations, or inclement weather operations. (b) A motor vehicle vehicle, truck tractor, OHV, farm tractor, or specialized construction equipment authorized under subsection (a) of this section to be equipped with a green revolving or flashing light may only use the light as follows: (1) When the motor vehicle is in service at an accident, fire, or disaster scene to signify a command post to which fire or police officials may report for instructions or orders. (2) If the motor vehicle is a hazardous material response vehicle traveling to an accident, fire, or disaster scene at the request of a fire department or police department. (3) If the When the motor vehicle vehicle, truck tractor, OHV, farm tractor or specialized construction equipment is snow removal equipment that is owned and operated by the State or a municipality and is in use during cold weather operations. actively being used for road or bridge construction, maintenance or repairs, as well as traffic control, emergency operations, or inclement weather operations.